Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.670

Enforcement—Official controls.

The board may determine and establish administrative rules and procedures for the application and enforcement of official controls, and may assign or delegate such administrative functions, powers and duties to such department or official as may be appropriate.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.670. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 67.]